Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.109.030

Reciprocal agreements to attend foreign institutions.

The office may negotiate and enter into a reciprocal agreement with foreign countries that have international students attending institutions in Washington. The goal of the reciprocal agreements shall be to allow Washington students enrolled in an institution of higher education to attend an international institution under similar terms and conditions.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 197; 1996 c 253 s 403.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Findings—Purpose—Severability—Part headings not law—1996 c 253: See notes following RCW 28B.109.010.